pt-PT: Nível de rigidez do tecido: Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outro
pt-BR: Nível de rigidez do tecido: Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outro
zh-TW: 織物硬挺度等級: 硬; 軟; 中; 其他
da: Stoffets stivhedsgrad: Tung; Lys; Medium; Andet
hr-HR: Razina krutosti tkanine: Teško; Lagano; Srednje; Ostalo
tr: Kumaş sertlik seviyesi: Sert; Yumuşak; Orta; Diğer
nl: Stijfheidsniveau van de stof: Zwaar; Licht; Medium; Overig
el: Επίπεδο σκληρότητας υφάσματος: Μεγάλο; Ελαφρύ; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
th: ระดับความแข็งของผ้า: ตึงมาก; แบบมีไฟ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
nb: Stoffets stivhetsnivå: Tung; Lett; Middels; Annet
ja: 生地の硬さレベル: 重い; 軽い; 中程度; その他
ko: 원단 경직도 수준: 강력; 부드러움; 중간; 기타
vi: Độ cứng của vải: Nặng; Nhẹ; Vừa; Khác
zh-CN: 织物硬挺度: 厚重; 轻薄; 中等; 其他
sv: Textilens styvhetsnivå.: Tung; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
sk-SK: Úroveň tuhosti tkaniny: Ťažká; Svetlá; Stredná; Iné
sl-SI: Stopnja togosti tkanine: Težka; Lahke; Srednja; Druga
ru: Степень жесткости ткани: Сильная; Легкая; Средняя; Другая
hu: Szövet merevségi szintje: Nehéz; Könnyű; Közepes; Egyéb
de: Steifigkeitsgrad des Gewebes: Schwer; Leicht; Medium; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Ниво на твърдост на тъканта: Много; Леко; Средно; Друго
es: Nivel de rigidez de la tela: Pesado; Ligero; Medio; Otros
en: Fabric stiffness level: Heavy; Light; Medium; Other
pl: Poziom sztywności tkaniny: Sztywne; Lekkie; Średnie; Pozostałe
ro-RO: Nivelul de rigiditate al țesăturii: Greu; Ușor; Mediu; Altele
it: Livello di rigidità del tessuto: Pesante; Leggero; Medio; Altro
fr: Niveau de rigidité du tissu: Lourd; Léger; Moyen; Autre
cs: Stupeň tuhosti látky: Velmi tuhé; Měkké a poddajné; Střední úroveň tuhosti; Jiné
lt-LT: Audinio standumo lygis: Sunkus; Šviesus; Vidutinis; Kita
fi: Kankaan jäykkyystaso: Raskas; Kevyt; Keskimääräinen; Muu